Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2221
Area plan and budget; contents.

The plan and budget adopted pursuant to section 81-2220 shall contain at least the following:

(1) Provisions required by the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as such federal act existed on January 1, 2016; and

(2) A detailed statement of the manner in which the area agency on aging develops, administers, and supports the comprehensive, coordinated program of community aging services throughout the area.

The department may require minimum service levels for the area and establish minimum standards for activities which carry out the requirements of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as such federal act existed on January 1, 2016.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 21;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 23;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 32.